Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 5 State Aid
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-5-1 — 16-5-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 53, §§ 1-5; P.L. 1898, ch. 544, §§ 3, 46; P.L. 1903, ch. 1101, §§ 5, 6; P.L. 1904, ch. 1147, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 65, §§ 1-5; ch. 66, §§ 9, 10; ch. 74, §§ 2, 3, 5; P.L. 1909, ch. 446, § 1; P.L. 1910, ch. 545, § 1; P.L. 1912, ch. 845, §§ 1-4; P.L. 1914, ch. 1098, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1234, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1654, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1919, ch. 1725, § 2; P.L. 1921, ch. 2055, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, §§ 8, 9, 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 67, §§ 1-5; ch. 68, §§ 1-5; ch. 70, §§ 8, 9; ch. 81, §§ 2, 3, 8; P.L. 1925, ch. 594, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 597, § 1; P.L. 1925, ch. 598, § 1; P.L. 1926, ch. 775, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; P.L. 1936, ch. 2375, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 178, §§ 8, 9; ch. 192, §§ 1-5; ch. 93, §§ 1-4; ch. 197, §§ 2, 3, 5, 8; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 825, § 1; G.L. 1956, §§

16-5-1

—

16-5-1

7; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-5-18.
Funds for training of practical nurses.

Funds shall be provided to the state board of regents for elementary and secondary education for vocational education for:

Establishment of a program for the training of practical nurses in the Woonsocket area.

After the establishment of a program for the training of practical nurses in the Woonsocket area, the existing facilities of the Providence program for the metropolitan area shall be expanded.

After the establishment of a program for the training of practical nurses in the Woonsocket area, and after the existing facilities of the Providence program for the metropolitan area have been expanded, the present program shall be extended to those other areas of the state where the need is evident.

The acceleration of the recruitment program for applicants for the practical nurse training program.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3764, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

16-5-18

.

16-5-19 — 16-5-21.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 53, §§ 7-9; P.L. 1898, ch. 540, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 65, §§ 7-9; P.L. 1916, ch. 1348, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 67, §§ 6-8; P.L. 1925, ch. 595, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 192, §§ 6-8; G.L. 1956, §§

16-5-19

— 16-5-21; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-5-22.
Appropriations to aid evening schools.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary for the support and maintenance of public evening schools in the several cities or towns of the state, to be apportioned by the board of regents for elementary and secondary education for the support of the schools as may be approved by the board; and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders for the payment of the sum, or so much of the sum as shall be required, on vouchers approved by the department of elementary and secondary education.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 53, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 65, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 67, § 9; P.L. 1925, ch. 596, § 1; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 192, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-5-22

.

16-5-23 — 16-5-29.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1923, ch. 81, §§ 9-11; P.L. 1936, ch. 2375, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 81, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 197, §§ 9-11; P.L. 1939, ch. 691, § 1; P.L. 1943, ch. 1275, § 1; P.L. 1944, ch. 1501, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §§

16-5-23

— 16-5-27; Repealed by P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 12.

16-5-30.
Withholding of aid for infraction of laws or regulations — Report to general assembly.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education may, for violation or neglect of law or for violation or neglect of rules and regulations in pursuance of law by any city or town or city or town officer or school committee, or for nonpayment of tuition owed by one community to another including but not limited to those children in state custody, vocational education, or special education, order the general treasurer to withhold the payment of any portion of the public money that has been or may be apportioned to the city or town; and the general treasurer upon the receipt in writing of the order shall hold the public money due the city or town until the time as the commissioner by writing requests the withheld funds for the purposes of eliminating the violation or neglect of law or regulation that caused the order to be issued, or the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall notify the treasurer that the city or town has complied with the order as the department of elementary and secondary education shall make in the premises, in which case payment shall be made to the town immediately. If the violation is for nonpayment of tuition and it has been determined by the commissioner that the tuition is owed, then the commissioner shall, subject to the debtor community’s right to appeal to the superior court, order the general treasurer to deduct the amount owed from the debtor community’s school aid and to pay the community which is owed the tuition. The board of regents for elementary and secondary education shall report to the general assembly annually all infractions of school law which shall be brought to its attention, with a record of this action as the department shall have taken in each instance.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 63, § 5; P.L. 1922, ch. 2234, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 65, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 176, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2752, §§ 8, 10, 21; G.L. 1956, §

16-5-30

; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 8; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 22, § 6.

16-5-30.1.
Penalty for violation.

Any community that does not comply with the provisions of §§

16-21-7

,

16-21-9

,

16-21-12

,

16-21-14

, and

16-38-2

shall be subject to the penalty provided in §

16-5-30

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 133, § 7.

16-5-31.
Educational improvement block grant.

There is created an educational improvement block grant.

The dollar equivalents resulting from the difference in the statewide local tax rate as defined in §

16-7-19(a)

and (b), and as divided in §

16-7-19(c)

, may be expended for any of the purposes set forth below:

Providing preschool programs, of at least one-half (1/2) day’s duration, for four (4) year old children who are at risk of school failure;

Providing parent education programs including the provision of resource materials on home learning activities, private and group educational guidance, individual and group learning experiences for the parent and child, and other activities that enable the parent to improve learning in the home;

Reducing class size with the ultimate goal of an average pupil/teacher ratio of 15-1 in grades pre-kindergarten through three (3); and

Providing full day kindergarten programs with first priority given to children who are at risk of school failure.

Education improvement block grant funds shall be allocated to every community in the proportion to which each community’s share bears to the total state share as computed under §

16-7-19(a)

and as further adjusted by minimum share and regional school district provisions as provided for in §

16-7-20

. In order to be eligible to obtain funds provided in this section a school district must submit, for the commissioner’s approval, an application which clearly and specifically describes how the funds will be used for the purposes intended.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall establish and promulgate regulations for the purpose of carrying out the intent of this section. Funds granted under this section shall not be used by districts to supplant local funds. School districts may carry over to the next fiscal year a maximum of fifteen percent (15%) of their allocation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1960, ch. 27, § 9; P.L. 1985, ch. 182, §§ 3, 4; P.L. 1986, ch. 198, § 8; P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 8; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 30.

16-5-32.
Elementary and secondary education excellence fund.

There is created a fund of three million dollars ($3,000,000) for the purposes set forth below:

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be used to make competitive grant awards to local school districts for exemplary dropout prevention programs;

One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be used to establish training programs for parents, with special emphasis on parents of preschool children, and to make competitive grant awards to local school districts for exemplary parent involvement programs;

One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) shall be used for school committee and administrator training;

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be used to make competitive grant awards to local school districts which develop exemplary school site management programs;

One million dollars ($1,000,000) shall be prorated among local school districts on the basis of their 1987-88 entitlement under §

16-7-20

to fund grants to further the literacy focus in instruction in kindergarten through grade three (3) for all students and supplementary literacy instruction for educationally disadvantaged students in grades kindergarten through twelve (12);

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be used to establish a statewide screening program for all children just entering school;

Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) for use by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education to implement recommendations of the task force to study the governor’s 1991 report on education;

Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be used for vocational education in accordance with §

16-45-7

; and

Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) will be used to establish and expand programs in area vocational schools.

All grant money received by a local school district from this fund will be ineligible for reimbursement under the school operations aid program. Funds, with the exception of subsection (a)(8), may not be used to supplant funding for existing programs and activities.

The commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall promulgate any rules and regulations as he or she shall deem necessary for the operation of the education excellence fund. The decision of the commissioner of elementary and secondary education shall be final on all questions regarding grants.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 581, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 1.

16-5-33.
Education partnership fund.

There is created and established a program to be known as the “education partnership program.” The commissioner of elementary and secondary education is authorized to accept grants and bequests from public and private sources with the approval of the director of administration which shall be deposited as general revenues. In order to carry out the purposes of grants and bequests the commissioner shall oversee the appropriated funds, adopt rules and regulations for the expenditure of these funds, and assess the effectiveness of its programs and projects. The state controller is directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of the sum, or so much of the sum as may be required upon receipt by the controller of vouchers duly authenticated by the commissioner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 336, § 9; P.L. 1995, ch. 70, art. 40, § 43.

16-5-34.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 264, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 298, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 13, § 4.